Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.211

Certificate of competency—Issuance—Renewal—Continuing education—Fees—Effect.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5528-S.SL) ***

(1) The department shall issue a certificate of competency to all applicants who have passed the examination provided in RCW 19.28.201, met the in-class education requirements of RCW 19.28.205 if applicable, and who have complied with RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 and the rules adopted under this chapter. The certificate may include a photograph of the holder. The certificate shall bear the date of issuance, and shall expire on the holder's birthday. The certificate shall be renewed every three years, upon application, on or before the holder's birthdate. A fee shall be assessed for each certificate and for each annual renewal.

(2) If the certificate holder demonstrates to the department that he or she has satisfactorily completed an annual eight-hour continuing education course, the certificate may be renewed without examination by appropriate application unless the certificate has been revoked, suspended, or not renewed within ninety days after the expiration date. For pump and irrigation or domestic pump specialty electricians, the continuing education course may combine both electrical and plumbing education provided that there is a minimum of four hours of electrical training in the course.

(a) The contents and requirements for satisfactory completion of the continuing education course shall be determined by the director and approved by the board.

(b) The department shall accept proof of a certificate holder's satisfactory completion of a continuing education course offered in another state as meeting the requirements for maintaining a current Washington state certificate of competency if the department is satisfied the course is comparable in nature to that required in Washington state for maintaining a current certificate of competency.

(3) If the certificate is not renewed before the expiration date, the individual shall pay twice the usual fee. The department shall set the fees by rule for issuance and renewal of a certificate of competency. The fees shall cover but not exceed the costs of issuing the certificates and of administering and enforcing the electrician certification requirements of this chapter.

(4) The certificates of competency and temporary permits provided for in this chapter grant the holder the right to work in the electrical construction trade as a master electrician, journey level electrician, or specialty electrician in accordance with their provisions throughout the state and within any of its political subdivisions without additional proof of competency or any other license, permit, or fee to engage in such work.

[ 2013 c 23 s 33; 2012 c 32 s 3; 2009 c 36 s 8; 2006 c 185 s 12; 2002 c 249 s 7; 2001 c 211 s 14; 1996 c 241 s 7; 1993 c 192 s 1; 1986 c 156 s 14; 1983 c 206 s 16; 1980 c 30 s 6. Formerly RCW 19.28.550.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 32: See note following RCW 19.28.205.

Finding—Intent—2009 c 36: See note following RCW 18.106.020.